Hawaii statutes.
[§271G-6] Exemptions, generally.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, its contents shall not
apply to:

(1) Persons transporting their own property where the
transportation is in furtherance of a primary business purpose or enterprise of
that person except where the transportation is undertaken by a water carrier to
evade the regulatory purposes of this chapter;

(2) Nonprofit agricultural cooperative associations
to the extent that they engage in the transportation of their own property or
the property of their members;

(3) Persons engaged in the transportation over water
of passengers or property for compensation, other than transportation referred
to in section 271G-5(7) under continuing contracts with one person or a limited
number of persons either (A) for the furnishing of transportation services
through the assignment of vessels for a continuing period of time to the
exclusive use of each person served, or (B) for the furnishing of
transportation services designed to meet the distinct need of each individual
customer;

(4) Persons transporting their own property or
employees where the transportation is in furtherance of a business or
enterprise of fishing or taking of fish for profit or gain as a means of
livelihood;

(5) Persons engaged in business of transporting
persons for sightseeing and other recreational activities. [L 1974, c 94, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next